Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF3876.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 299D.03, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Members, powers, and duties. (a) The commissioner is hereby authorized to employ and designate a chief supervisor, a chief assistant supervisor, and such assistant supervisors, sergeants and officers as are provided by law, who shall comprise the Minnesota State Patrol. (b) The members of the Minnesota State Patrol shall have the power and authority: (1) as peace officers to enforce the provisions of the law relating to the protection of and use of trunk highways; (2) at all times to direct all traffic on trunk highways in conformance with law, and in the event of a fire or other emergency, or to expedite traffic or to insure safety, to direct traffic on other roads as conditions may require notwithstanding the provisions of law; (3) to serve search warrants related to criminal motor vehicle and traffic violations and arrest warrants, and legal documents anywhere in the state; (4) to serve orders of the commissioner of public safety or the commissioner's duly authorized agents issued under the provisions of the Driver's License Law, the Safety Responsibility Act, or relating to authorized brake- and light-testing stations, anywhere in the state and to take possession of any license, permit, or certificate ordered to be surrendered; (5) to inspect official brake and light adjusting stations; (6) to make appearances anywhere within the state for the purpose of conducting traffic safety educational programs and school bus clinics; (7) to exercise upon all trunk highways the same powers with respect to the enforcement of laws relating to crimes, as sheriffs and police officers; (8) to cooperate, under instructions and rules of the commissioner of public safety, with all sheriffs and other police officers anywhere in the state, provided that said employees shall have no power or authority in connection with strikes or industrial disputes; (9) to assist and aid any peace officer whose life or safety is in jeopardy; (10) as peace officers to provide security and protection to the governor, governor elect, either or both houses of the legislature, and state buildings or property in the manner and to the extent determined to be necessary after consultation with the governor, or a designee. Pursuant to this clause, members of the State Patrol, acting as peace officers have the same powers with respect to the enforcement of laws relating to crimes, as sheriffs and police officers have within their respective jurisdictions; (11) to inspect school buses anywhere in the state for the purposes of determining compliance with vehicle equipment, pollution control, and registration requirements; (12) as peace officers to make arrests for public offenses committed in their presence anywhere within the state. Persons arrested for violations other than traffic violations shall be referred forthwith to the appropriate local law enforcement agency for further investigation or disposition; deleted text begin anddeleted text end (13) to enforce the North American uniform out-of-service criteria and issue out-of-service orders, as defined in Code of Federal Regulations, title 49, section 383.5deleted text begin .deleted text end new text begin ; andnew text end new text begin (14) as peace officers to provide security and protection to the chief justice in the manner and to the extent determined to be necessary after consultation with the chief justice or a designee. Pursuant to this clause, members of the State Patrol acting as peace officers have the same powers with respect to the enforcement of laws relating to crimes as sheriffs and police officers have within their respective jurisdictions. new text end (c) After consultation with the governor or a designee, the commissioner may require the State Patrol to provide security and protection to supreme court justices, legislators, and constitutional officers other than the governor, for a limited period and within the limits of existing resources, in response to a credible threat on the individual's life or safety. (d) The state may contract for State Patrol members to render the services described in this section in excess of their regularly scheduled duty hours and patrol members rendering such services shall be compensated in such amounts, manner and under such conditions as the agreement provides. (e) Employees thus employed and designated shall subscribe an oath. Sec. 2. new text begin SUPREME COURT APPROPRIATIONS.new text end new text begin $101,000 in fiscal year 2027 is appropriated from the general fund to the supreme court to provide security for the chief justice. This appropriation is added to the base beginning in fiscal year 2028. new text end